Utah statutes.
10-8-15.   Waterworks -- Construction -- Extraterritorial jurisdiction.

They may construct or authorize the construction of waterworks within or without the city limits, and for the purpose of maintaining and protecting the same from injury and the water from pollution their jurisdiction shall extend over the territory occupied by such works, and over all reservoirs, streams, canals, ditches, pipes and drains used in and necessary for the construction, maintenance and operation of the same, and over the stream or source from which the water is taken, for 15 miles above the point from which it is taken and for a distance of 300 feet on each side of such stream and over highways along such stream or watercourse within said 15 miles and said 300 feet; provided, that the jurisdiction of cities of the first class shall be over the entire watershed, except that livestock shall be permitted to graze beyond one thousand feet from any such stream or source; and provided further, that each city of the first class shall provide a highway in and through its corporate limits, and so far as its jurisdiction extends, which may not be closed to cattle, horses, sheep or hogs driven through any such city, or through any territory adjacent thereto over which such city has jurisdiction, but the board of commissioners of such city may enact ordinances placing under police regulations the manner of driving such cattle, sheep, horses and hogs through such city, or any territory adjacent thereto over which it has jurisdiction.  They may enact all ordinances and regulations necessary to carry the power herein conferred into effect, and are authorized and empowered to enact ordinances preventing pollution or contamination of the streams or watercourses from which the inhabitants of cities derive their water supply, in whole or in part, for domestic and culinary purposes, and may enact ordinances prohibiting or regulating the construction or maintenance of any closet, privy, outhouse or urinal within the area over which the city has jurisdiction, and provide for permits for the construction and maintenance of the same.  In granting such permits they may annex thereto such reasonable conditions and requirements for the protection of the public health as they deem proper, and may, if deemed advisable, require that all closets, privies and urinals along such streams shall be provided with effective septic tanks or other germ-destroying instrumentalities.

